Utah statutes.
63G-6-504.   Bid security requirements -- Directed suretyship prohibited --
Penalty.
(1)  Bid security in amount equal to at least 5% of the amount of the bid
shall be required for all competitive sealed bidding for construction
contracts.  Bid security shall be a bond provided by a surety company
authorized to do business in this state, the equivalent in cash, or any other
form satisfactory to the state.
(2)  When a bidder fails to comply with the requirement for bid security set
forth in the invitation for bids, the bid shall be rejected unless, pursuant
to rules, it is determined that the failure to comply with the security
requirements is nonsubstantial.
(3)  After the bids are opened, they shall be irrevocable for the period
specified in the invitation for bids, except as provided in Subsection
63G-6-401(6).  If a bidder is permitted to withdraw a bid before award, no
action shall be taken against the bidder or the bid security.
(4) (a)  When issuing an invitation for a bid under this chapter, the chief
procurement officer or the head of the purchasing agency responsible for
carrying out a construction project may not require a person or entity who is
bidding for a contract to obtain a bond of the type referred to in Subsection
(1) from a specific insurance or surety company, producer, agent, or broker.
(b)  A person who violates Subsection (4)(a) is guilty of an infraction.
